District of Columbia statutes.
8-109.10

Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to supercede the requirements of District government zoning statutes and regulations or federal and District government environmental statutes or regulations.

Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-36, § 11, 36 DCR 5741

History

1981 Ed., § 6-990.

Prior Codifications